Hawaii statutes.
§713-1300 Repeal and recodification.
[Omitted as functus.]

APPENDIX

1. ABBREVIATIONS

Colum. L. Rev. Columbia
Law Review

Eng. Rep. English
Reports--Full Preprint

F. Federal
Reporter

F.2d Federal
Reporter, Second Series

F. Supp. Federal
Supplement

Haw. Hawaii
Reports

H.R.S. or HRS Hawaii
Revised Statutes

H.R.Cr.P. Hawaii
Rules of Criminal

Procedure (1960)

Ill. Cr. Code Illinois
Criminal Code (1961)

M.P.C. American Law
Institute, Model Penal

Code, Proposed Official

Draft (1962)

Mich. L. Rev. Michigan
Law Review

N.Y.R.P.L. New
York Revised Penal Law (1965)

Prop. Del. Cr. Code Proposed
Delaware Criminal

Code (1967)

Prop. Mich. Rev. Cr. Code Proposed
Michigan Revised

Criminal Code (1967)

Q.B. Queen's
Bench Reports

Stan. L. Rev. Stanford
Law Review

U.S. United
States Supreme Court Reports

Weekly L. R. Weekly
Law Reports (English)

2. TABLE OF
DISPOSITION--TITLE 37. CRIMINAL LAW

R = Repealed

________________________________________________________________

Former § Present § Former § Present
§

________________________________________________________________

C701 R 711-21
to 23 806-21 to 23

C702 R 711-26
to 42 806-26 to 42

C703 R 711-46
to 51 806-46 to 51

C704 R 711-56 806-56

705-1 to 3 R 711-61
to 64 806-61 to 64

705-4 801-1 711-65,
66 R

705-5 801-5 711-67,
68 806-65, 66

705-5.5 R 711-71
to 73 R

705-6 to 8 801-2 to 4 711-76,
77 R

705C-1 to 12 802-1 to 12 711-78,
79 806-72, 73

C706 R 711-80
to 83 R

C707 R 711-84 806-71

708-1 to 11 803-1 to 11 711-85,
91 to 94 R

708-21 to 24 803-21 to 24 711-96 806-76

708-31 to 38 803-31 to 38 C712 R

709-1 to 19 804-1 to 19 713-1 to
27 832-1 to 27

709-31 to 41 804-31 to 41 713C-1
to 6 833-1 to 6

709-51 804-51 714-1 to
6 834-1 to 6

710-1 to 11 805-1 to 11 715-1 to
19 841-1 to 19

710-12 to 14 R 716-1 to
7 831-1 to 7

710-15 805-12 718-1 to
8 835-1 to 8

711-1, 2 806-1, 2 719-1 to
6 836-1 to 6

711-6 to 10 806-6 to 10 720-1 to
12 842-1 to 12

711-16 to 18 806-16 to 18

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next